Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201585-2010
Community college gap assistance program; committee; duties; meetings.

(1) The committee shall develop a common applicant tracking system for the community college gap assistance program that shall be implemented consistently by each participating community college.

(2) The committee shall coordinate statewide oversight, evaluation, and reporting efforts for the community college gap assistance program.

(3) The committee shall meet at least quarterly to evaluate and monitor the performance of the community college gap assistance program to determine if performance measures are being met and shall take necessary steps to correct any deficiencies. Performance measures include, but are not limited to, eligible program completion rates, job attainment rates, and continuing education rates.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 36.
August 30, 2015